Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 1

General Provisions

41-9-101. Community work project coordinator.

The department of correction is authorized to employ or assign, in each judicial district, a person for the position of community work project coordinator.

The work project coordinator shall be compensated as other state employees and shall be supervised by the director of probation and parole.

The duties of the coordinator include, but are not limited to, the following:

Preparing, receiving and reviewing applications from qualified organizations and entities for projects within the district, or within other judicial districts, that may be performed by probationer or parolee labor;

Interviewing and screening the probationers or parolees available for community work projects in order to match their particular job skills with the type of labor needed;

Coordinating the various approved work projects to ensure that the probationers or parolees available are being utilized efficiently and to the best of their abilities;

Regularly inspecting each approved work project to ensure that the probationers or parolees are being properly supervised, that they do not pose a threat to members of the community in the area in which they are working and that they are being utilized to perform the type of work for which they were requested; and

Performing such other duties as may be assigned by the department of correction.

Acts 1984, ch. 990, § 1; 1998, ch. 1049, §§ 56-60; 2012, ch. 727, § 56.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the transfer of certain functions relating to probation and parole services and the community correction grant program from the board of probation and parole to the department of correction, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 727.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 63 provided that the implementation of the act, which amended subsection (a) and subdivision (c)(5), shall be fully accomplished on or before January 1, 2013.

Cross-References. County community work projects for probationers, title 41, ch. 9, part 2.

Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

Work release programs for inmates, title 41, ch. 21, part 5.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

41-9-102. Applications for probationer labor.

Any charitable organization or governmental entity within a judicial district is eligible to apply with the work project coordinator of the district for probationer labor to perform a specific work project for that organization or entity.

The application forms shall be prepared by the coordinator of each district but shall contain the following information:

The charitable organization or governmental entity for whom the work will be performed;

The specific work project for which probationer labor is requested;

The specific job skills, if any, that will be required to complete the project;

The number of probationers requested for the project;

The anticipated period of time the work project will take to complete; and

The person in the organization or entity that will be responsible for the supervision and care of any probationer working on the project.

When the work project application forms have been prepared, any charitable organization exempt from taxation pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), or any agency, branch, department or other entity of municipal, county, state or federal government may submit an application for probationer labor to the work project coordinator of the judicial district in which the work project is to be performed.

The work project coordinator shall review each application so submitted and first determine whether the organization or entity is eligible for probationer labor under subsection (c). If the coordinator determines it is not, the application shall be rejected. If the coordinator determines that the application is from an eligible organization or entity, the coordinator may approve or reject it. If it is rejected, the coordinator shall state the reasons for the rejection in writing and send a copy to the applicant. The coordinator may also approve an application subject to certain modifications the coordinator deems necessary. If of the opinion that a work project should be modified as to certain particulars, the coordinator shall send a copy of the proposed modifications to the applicant. If the applicant agrees to the modifications, the coordinator may approve the application as modified. If the coordinator and applicant cannot agree as to some or all of the modifications, the coordinator may approve the application as originally filed, may approve the application subject to the agreed upon modifications or may reject the application.

The decision of a work project coordinator as to whether an organization or entity is eligible for a work project and as to whether the application should be approved or rejected shall be final and shall not be subject to review by appeal except in cases of abuse of discretion. The director of probation and parole shall have authority over the appeals.

Acts 1984, ch. 990, § 1; 1990, ch. 805, § 1; 1998, ch. 1049, § 61.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

41-9-103. Probationers — Eligibility — Reporting for work — Violations.

Work projects approved pursuant to this part shall be performed by defendants who have been placed on probation pursuant to § 40-35-303, and who, as a condition of probation, have been ordered to perform a period of community service work as provided in § 40-35-303(d)(3).

When a judge places a defendant on probation and orders the defendant to perform community service work, the judge shall direct the defendant to report to the work project coordinator in the judicial district in which the defendant resides or where the offense occurred. The coordinator shall interview the defendant for the purpose of determining job skills and the work project for which the defendant is best suited. Failure of a defendant to report to the work project coordinator when directed to do so by a judge shall constitute a violation of the defendant's probation and shall be reported by the coordinator to the defendant's probation officer.

After interviewing a defendant and determining the work project to which the defendant is best suited, the coordinator shall give the defendant a date and time to report, the location of the work project and the name of the person responsible for supervising the work project. The defendant shall be responsible for reporting to the project supervisor at the designated date and time. Prior to that date and time, the coordinator shall notify the project supervisor of the name of the defendant, the defendant's job skills, and the date and time the defendant is to report to work. If the defendant does not appear for work at the designated date and time, the project supervisor shall so notify the coordinator. Failure of a defendant to appear at a work project when directed to do so by the coordinator shall constitute a violation of the defendant's probation and shall be reported by the coordinator to the defendant's probation officer.

If any defendant placed on probation and ordered to perform community service work pursuant to § 40-35-303 is employed or is seeking employment, the work project coordinator shall assign the defendant to a work project that can be performed during times that do not interfere with the defendant's employment or seeking of employment.

Acts 1984, ch. 990, § 1.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

41-9-104. Liability for injury.

No charitable organization or governmental entity authorized by § 41-9-102 to utilize probationer labor pursuant to this part shall be liable for any injury sustained by a probationer or other person while the probationer is performing a work project for the organization or entity, if the organization or entity exercised due care in the protection and supervision of the probationer.

Acts 1985, ch. 15, § 1.